Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-201
Supreme Court; how constituted; Chief Justice.

The Supreme Court shall consist of the Chief Justice and six judges, and the Chief Justice shall preside at all sessions of the court.

Laws 1879, § 10, p. 83;

R.S.1913, § 1137;

C.S.1922, § 1066;

C.S.1929, § 27-201;

R.S.1943, § 24-201.